District of Columbia statutes.
34-2409.01

Levy permitted.

To aid in the erection, maintenance, and efficiency of fireplugs, a special annual tax may be levied on all buildings in the City of Washington within 500 feet of any main water pipe, into which, or the premises connected therewith, the water has not been introduced, and the owners or occupants of which do not pay any annual water rate in accordance with law.

R.S., D.C., § 205
June 17, 1890, 26 Stat. 159, ch. 428
1981 Ed., § 43-1534.
1973 Ed., § 43-1525.